Hawaii statutes.
[§88-45.4] Contributions for unpaid
leaves of absence. Contributions required as a condition to inclusion in
membership service of unpaid leaves of absence shall be made by the member
within one year after return from the leave of absence. [L 2015, c 86, §2]

Revision Note

Section was enacted as an addition to subpart A but was
codified to this subpart pursuant to §23G-15.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next